test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k20_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    akur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: akur
    akur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: akur
    akur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: akri
    akur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: akurs
    akur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: akrar
    akur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: akrar
    akur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: økrum
    akur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: akra
    akur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: akurin
    akur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: akurin
    akur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: akrinum
    akur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: akursins
    akur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: akrarnir
    akur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: akrarnar
    akur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: økrunum
    akur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: akranna
